Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2782
Income tax; evidence; federal determination; admissible.

Evidence of a federal determination relating to issues raised in a proceeding under the provisions of section 77-2778 shall be admissible, under rules established by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 82, p. 1606.